District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.09

Rulemaking and contracting authority.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Pursuant to Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2, the Mayor may execute contracts, grants, and other legally binding documents to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 109, 54 DCR 818

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 109 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).